Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-7202
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Child Care Tax Credit Act:

(1) Child means an individual who is five years of age or less;

(2) Department means the Department of Revenue;

(3) Eligible program means a program that is licensed as a family child care home I, family child care home II, child care center, or preschool and operates as a for-profit child care business or is a nonprofit organization under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;

(4) Intermediary means any organization that distributes funds for the purpose of supporting an eligible program;

(5) Parent or legal guardian means an individual who claims a child as a dependent for federal income tax purposes;

(6) Qualifying contribution means a contribution in the form of cash, check, cash equivalent, agricultural commodity, livestock, or publicly traded security that is made:

(a) For the establishment or operation of an eligible program;

(b) For the establishment of a grant or loan program for parents requiring financial assistance for an eligible program;

(c) To an early childhood collaborative or another intermediary to provide training, technical assistance, or mentorship to child care providers;

(d) For the establishment or ongoing costs of an information dissemination program that assists parents with information and referral services for child care;

(e) To a for-profit child care business, including family home providers. The for-profit child care business must use the proceeds of a qualifying contribution for (i) the acquisition or improvement of child care facilities, (ii) the acquisition of equipment, (iii) providing services, or (iv) employee retention; or

(f) To an intermediary for the establishment or operation of an eligible program or for the establishment of a grant or loan program for parents requiring financial assistance for an eligible program;

(7) Taxpayer means any person subject to the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, including resident and nonresident individuals, estates, trusts, and corporations, an insurance company subject to premium and related retaliatory tax liability imposed by section 44-150, 77-908, or 81-523, or a financial institution subject to the franchise tax imposed by sections 77-3801 to 77-3807; and

(8) Total household income means federal modified adjusted gross income.

Laws 2023, LB754, § 2;

Laws 2025, LB182, § 7.

Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, see section 77-2701.